Arkansas, session 2025, SB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-79-307(a)(6)(A), concerning the notice
requirements of an insurer due to a premium increase, is amended to read as
follows:
(6)(A) When an insurer revises its the insurer's rates or rules
and the revision results in a premium increase equal to or greater than
twenty-five percent (25%) on any renewal policy issued for a term of twelve
(12) months or less, the insurer shall mail or deliver to the insured's agent
not less than thirty (30) sixty (60) days prior to before the effective date
of renewal, and to the insured not less than ten (10) thirty (30) days prior
to before the effective date of renewal, notice specifically stating the
insurer's intention to increase the premium by an amount equal to or greater
than twenty-five percent (25%).


*ANS098*
01/15/2025 12:21:30 PM ANS098